Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB419.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5904. Train Derailment Emergency Grant Program.(a) Establishment of program. --The Train Derailment Emergency Grant Program is established to provide grants to eligible persons.(b) Administration.--(1) The agency shall administer the program.(2) The agency shall establish a grant application and evaluation process. The agency shall provide notice of the application process on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) The agency may contract with a third party to 12345678910111213141516171819 administer the program.(c) Expenses.--The agency may expend not more than 2% of the money in the fund for costs incurred in the administration of the program. Except if an expiration date is enacted for this section, the agency may n ot establish a deadline for submission of applications.(d) Grants.--(1) A grant may be awarded for any of the following which were a direct result of the train derailment:(i) Medical expenses.(ii) Loss of income and value of a small business. (iii) Loss of real or personal property value of a small business.(iv) Expenses of a small business.(v) Loss of re al property value of a homeowner. (vi) Expenses related to repair, cleaning and decontami nation of real property of a homeowner and any other related expense, as reasonably determined by a homeowner.(vii) Relocation expenses, including travel, food and housing for individuals who do any of the following:(A) Permanently move out of the disaster zone.(B) Temporarily relocate during or after the evacuation period as determined by the individual to be necessary because of the disaster without limitation as to the area of the disaster zone if the individual has a personal reason to believe they need to relocate from the disaster area.(2) If an eligible person knowingly submits a grant application with materially false information, the eligible 20250SB0419PN0353 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person shall repay the amount of the grant to the agency, including interest of 8%.(3) The agency shall review completed applications and award pro rata grants to persons deemed eligible. If a grant award is denied in whole or in part, the agency shall provide the applicant with the reason for the full or partial denial.(e) Award.--An application may be filed at any time but may not include an award for expenses or losses occurring prior to February 3, 2023.(f) Establishment of fund. --The Train Derailment Emergency Grant Fund is established as a fund within the State Treasury. The use of money in the fund is restricted to the purposes under this section. The money i n the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the agency for the purposes stated under this section.(g) Sources of funding.--Sources of the fund may be any of the following:(1) Money appropriated for purposes of the program.(2) Federal money appropriated or authorized for purposes of the program.(3) Money received from another governmental agency through an interagency agreement or memorandum of understanding.(4) A gift or other contribution from a public or private source.(5) Monetary damages and settlements paid to the Commonwealth from an individual or entity responsible for the train derailment.(6) Penalties or fines imposed as a result of the train derailment.20250SB0419PN0353 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Actual proof." A preponderance of evidence, whether medical, lab testing results, business records, documentary material and testimonial, that a reasonable person would understand to consist of, more likely than not, contamination evidence."Agency." The Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency."Disaster zone." Any of the following:(1) An area located within this Commonwealth that is within 15 miles of the site of the derailment of a train at East Palestine, Ohio, on February 3, 2023.(2) An area located in this Commonwealth where an applicant demonstrates actual proof of contamination of a premises or of a person due to the presence of chemicals released or burned at the area under paragraph (1) or because of travel in or through the area under paragraph (1)."Eligible person." Any of the following that has been negatively impacted by the train derailment a nd has been approved by the agency under subsection (b):(1) An individual who is a resident of this Commonwealth and who lives or works in the disaster zone and who provides actual proof of being negatively impacted.(2) A small business that is located in the disaster zone and which provides actual proof of being negatively impacted."Fund." The Train Derailment Emergency Grant Fund established u nder subsection (f). "Grant." An award of money by the agency under the program.20250SB0419PN0353 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Homeowner." An individual that owns a home in the disaster zone."Neg atively impacted." The incurring of any of the items under subsection (d) as a direct result of the effects of the train derailment."Program." The Train Derailment Emergency Grant Program established under subsection (a)."Small business." A business located in the disaster zone that employs fewer than 100 employees. The term includes a farm located in the disaster zone."Train derailment." The derailment of a train which occurred at East Palestine, Ohio, on February 3, 2023. The term includes the chemical release due to the train derailment.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0419PN0353 - 5 - 1234567891011121314